Georgia, session 2025_26, HB92.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
19 PART I
20 SECTION 1-1.
21 Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to revenue and taxation, is
22 amended in Code Section 48-5-2, relating to definitions relative to ad valorem taxation of
23 property, by revising paragraph (2.1) as follows:
24 "(2.1) 'Estimated roll-back rate' means, for any given levying or recommending authority,
25 the current year's estimated millage rate for general maintenance and operations minus
26 the millage equivalent of the total net assessed value added by reassessments:
27 (A) As as calculated and certified to the tax commissioner by the levying or
28 recommending authority pursuant to Code Section 48-5-306.2 for county and
29 educational tax purposes; and
30 (B) As calculated and certified to the collecting officer of the municipality by the
31 levying authority for municipal tax purposes."
32 SECTION 1-2.
33 Said title is further amended in Code Section 48-5-34, relating to ad valorem property tax bill
34 form, by revising subsection (b) and adding a new subsection to read as follows:
35 "(b) In addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section, regarding any
36 ad valorem property tax bill where if the millage rate adopted by a tax taxing authority
37 exceeds the estimated roll-back rate and such estimated roll-back rate was provided in the
38 annual notice of assessment, such tax bill shall include a notice containing the name of
39 such taxing authority and the following statement in bold print:
- 2 -

25 LC 50 1237S
40 'The adopted millage rate exceeds the estimated roll-back rate as stated in the annual
41 notice of assessment that you previously received for this taxable year, which will
42 result in an increase in the amount of property tax that you will owe.'
43 (c)(1) If the governing authority of a county, consolidated government, municipality, or
44 school district elected to opt out of the homestead exemption provided for in Code
45 Section 48-5-44.2 and there is not in effect for such political subdivision a base year
46 value homestead exemption or adjusted base year value homestead exemption that is
47 generally applicable for homestead residents, each ad valorem property tax bill issued by
48 such political subdivision for homestead properties shall contain a notice in bold print
49 that corresponds with the following statement:
50 '[Name of the political subdivision] chose to opt out of property tax relief for
51 homeowners related to HB 581 (2024). If you have concerns about that decision,
52 please call [the main telephone number for the levying or recommending authority of
53 the political subdivision].'
54 (2) The provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection shall not apply for any taxable year
55 beginning after December 31, 2029."
56 SECTION 1-3.
57 Said title is further amended in Code Section 48-5-44.2, relating to base year homestead
58 exemption, by revising paragraph (4) of subsection (a) and subsections (e) and (i) as follows:
59 "(4) 'Homestead' means homestead as defined and qualified in Code Section 48-5-40,
60 with the additional limitation that it shall include:
61 (A) Only the primary residence and not more than five contiguous acres of land
62 immediately surrounding such residence; or
63 (B) If the property is assessed pursuant to Code Section 48-5-7.4 or 48-5-7.7, only the
64 primary residence and the portion of the underlying property that is excluded from the
- 3 -

25 LC 50 1237S
65 benefit of such assessment pursuant to subparagraph (a)(1)(B) of Code Section 48-5-7.4
66 or subparagraph (b)(2)(B) of Code Section 48-5-7.7."
67 "(e) The exemption granted by subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section shall be claimed
68 and returned as provided in Code Section 48-5-50.1. Such exemption shall be
69 automatically renewed from year to year so long as the owner occupies the residence as a
70 homestead. After a person or a person's agent has filed the proper application or is
71 automatically granted the homestead exemption as provided in subsection (d) of this Code
72 section, it shall not be necessary for such person or such person's surviving spouse to make
73 application thereafter for any year, and the exemption shall continue to be allowed to such
74 person or such person's surviving spouse. It shall be the duty of any person granted the
75 homestead exemption under subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section to notify the tax
76 receiver or tax commissioner of the local government or governments in the event such
77 person for any reason becomes ineligible for such exemption."
78 "(i)(1) The governing authority of any county, consolidated government, municipality,
79 or school district may elect to opt out of the homestead exemption otherwise granted by
80 subsection (b) of this Code section with respect to such political subdivision through the
81 adoption of a resolution to do the same by March 1, 2025, after completing the following
82 steps:
83 (1)(A) The governing authority shall advertise its intent to do so and shall conduct at
84 least three public hearings thereon, at least one of which shall commence between the
85 hours of 6:00 P.M. and 7:00 P.M., inclusive, on a business weekday. The governing
86 authority shall place an advertisement in a newspaper of general circulation serving the
87 residents of the political subdivision and post such advertisement on its website, which
88 shall read as follows:
89 'INTENT TO OPT OUT OF HOMESTEAD EXEMPTION
90 The (name of governing authority) intends to opt out of the statewide adjusted
91 base year ad valorem homestead exemption for (name of the political subdivision).
- 4 -

25 LC 50 1237S
92 All concerned citizens are invited to the public hearing on this matter to be held
93 at (place of meeting) on (date and time).
94 Times and places of additional public hearings on this matter are at (place of
95 meeting) on (date and time).'
96 Simultaneously with this notice the governing authority shall provide a press release to
97 the local media.; and
98 (2)(B) The advertisement required by subparagraph (A) of this paragraph (1) of this
99 subsection shall appear at least one week prior to each hearing, be prominently
100 displayed, be not less than 30 square inches, and not be placed in that section of the
101 newspaper where legal notices appear and shall be posted on the appropriate website
102 at least one week prior to each hearing. In addition to the advertisement specified under
103 this paragraph, the levying or recommending authority may include in the notice
104 reasons or explanations for its intention to opt out of the homestead exemption.
105 (3)(2) No resolution election to opt out of the homestead exemption pursuant to this
106 Code section shall become effective with respect to a political subdivision unless the
107 procedures and hearings required by paragraph (1) of this subsection are completed and
108 a copy of such resolution is filed with the Secretary of State by March 1, 2025.
109 (3) For an election to opt out of the homestead exemption pursuant to this subsection to
110 remain effective for tax years 2027 and after with respect to a political subdivision that
111 does not have in effect a base year value homestead exemption or an adjusted base year
112 value homestead exemption that is generally applicable to homestead residents, the
113 governing authority of such political subdivision shall complete the same procedures and
114 hearings required by paragraph (1) of this subsection, except that a copy of the required
115 resolution shall be filed with the Secretary of State by March 1, 2027.
116 (4) The governing authority of any county, consolidated government, municipality, or
117 school district that has elected to opt out of the homestead exemption pursuant to this
118 subsection may rescind such election at any time by adopting a resolution to do so and
- 5 -

25 LC 50 1237S
119 filing a copy of such resolution with the Secretary of State; provided, however, that such
120 resolution to rescind the election to opt out shall only be effective for:
121 (A) Tax year 2025 if a copy of the resolution is filed with the Secretary of State by
122 April 30, 2025; and
123 (B) Any other tax year from 2026 through 2029 if a copy of the resolution is filed with
124 the Secretary of State by March 1 of such year."
125 SECTION 1-4.
126 Said title is further amended in Code Section 48-5-45, relating to application for homestead
127 exemption and unlawful to solicit fee to file application for homestead for another, by
128 revising subsection (a) as follows:
129 "(a)(1) An applicant seeking a homestead exemption as provided in Code
130 Section 48-5-44 and qualifying under the provisions of Code Section 48-5-40 shall file
131 a written application and schedule with the tax receiver or tax commissioner charged with
132 the duty of receiving returns of property for taxation at any time during the calendar year
133 subsequent to the property becoming the primary residence of the applicant up to and
134 including the date for the closing of the books for the return of taxes for the calendar year,
135 except that, in the case of a property which is subject to a reassessment by the board of
136 tax assessors, such application and schedule may be filed in conjunction with or in lieu
137 of an appeal of the reassessment.
138 (2) The failure to file properly the application and schedule on or before the date for the
139 closing of the books for the return of taxes of a calendar year in which the taxes are due
140 shall constitute a waiver of the homestead exemption on the part of the applicant failing
141 to make the application for such exemption for that year."
- 6 -

25 LC 50 1237S
142 SECTION 1-5.
143 Said title is further amended in Code Section 48-5-306, relating to annual notice of current
144 assessment, contents, posting notice, and new assessment description, by revising
145 paragraph (1) of subsection (b) as follows:
146 "(1) The annual notice of current assessment required to be given by the county board
147 of tax assessors under subsection (a) of this Code section shall be dated and shall contain
148 the name and last known address of the taxpayer. The annual notice shall conform with
149 be given on the applicable state-wide uniform assessment notice form which shall be
150 established by the commissioner by rule and regulation and shall contain:
151 (A) The amount of the previous assessment;
152 (B) The amount of the current assessment;
153 (C) The year for which the new assessment is applicable;
154 (D) A brief description of the assessed property broken down into real and personal
155 property classifications;
156 (E) The fair market value of property of the taxpayer subject to taxation and the
157 assessed value of the taxpayer's property subject to taxation after being reduced;
158 (F) The name, phone number, and contact information of the person in the assessors'
159 office who is administratively responsible for the handling of the appeal and who the
160 taxpayer may contact if the taxpayer has questions about the reasons for the assessment
161 change or the appeals process;
162 (G) If available, the public internet website address of the office of the county board
163 of tax assessors;
164 (H) A statement that all documents and records used to determine the current value are
165 available upon request; and
166 (I)(i) The current year's estimated roll-back rate for each levying or recommending
167 authority that certified its estimated roll-back rate for the current year to the county
- 7 -

25 LC 50 1237S
168 board of tax assessors and county tax commissioner by the date specified under Code
169 Section 48-5-306.2; or
170 (ii) For each levying or recommending authority that did not certify its estimated
171 roll-back rate to the county board of tax assessors and county tax commissioner by the
172 date specified in Code Section 48-5-306.2, the millage rate that was actually levied
173 by or on behalf of such authority for the previous tax year, and an estimate of the
174 amount of ad valorem taxes due for the assessed property based on such millage rate
175 and the amount of the current assessment."
176 SECTION 1-6.
177 Said title is further amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
178 "48-5-306.2.
179 Each levying and recommending authority shall annually calculate its estimated roll-back
180 rate for the current year and shall certify such rate to the county board of tax assessors and
181 county tax commissioner no less than 15 days prior to the postmark of the annual notice
182 of assessment."
183 PART II
184 SECTION 2-1.
185 Said title is further amended in Code Section 48-8-3, relating to exemptions from sales and
186 use taxes, by adding a new paragraph to read as follows:
187 "(10.1)(A) Notwithstanding any provision of Code Section 48-8-63 to the contrary, the
188 sale or use of qualifying construction materials used in capital outlay projects for
189 educational purposes.
190 (B) The exemption provided for in this paragraph shall only apply to local sales and
191 use taxes.
- 8 -

25 LC 50 1237S
192 (C)(i) Notwithstanding the exemption provided for in subparagraph (A) of this
193 paragraph, all sales and use taxes imposed on the sale or use of qualifying
194 construction materials shall be paid and collected pursuant to the requirements of this
195 chapter.
196 (ii) The benefit of the exemption allowed by this paragraph may be claimed by the
197 local school system for which the qualifying construction materials were used. To
198 claim the exemption, the local school system shall file a request for refund in the
199 manner prescribed by the department. The department shall refund to the local school
200 system the amount of taxes paid on qualifying construction materials used in the
201 capital outlay project for educational purposes. No refund made pursuant to this
202 paragraph shall include interest.
203 (iii) Any refund received by a local school system pursuant to this paragraph shall be
204 allocated to a fund or account for capital outlay projects and used in accordance with
205 the requirements for sales taxes for educational purposes authorized pursuant to
206 Article VIII, Section VI, Paragraph IV of the Constitution of Georgia.
207 (D) As used in this paragraph, the term:
208 (i) 'Capital outlay project for educational purposes' means a project that:
209 (I) Was approved and funded through a sales tax for educational purposes
210 authorized pursuant to Article VIII, Section VI, Paragraph IV of the Constitution of
211 Georgia; and
212 (II) Is for a local school system which has in effect a base year value homestead
213 exemption or adjusted base year value homestead exemption from ad valorem
214 taxation for educational purposes for all residents of the local school system.
215 (ii) 'Local sales and use taxes' mean sales taxes, use taxes, or local sales and use taxes
216 levied or imposed at any time in any area consisting of less than the entire state,
217 however authorized, including, but not limited to, such taxes authorized by or
218 pursuant to a constitutional amendment; by or pursuant to Section 25 of an Act
- 9 -

25 LC 50 1237S
219 approved March 10, 1965 (Ga. L. 1965, p. 2243), as amended, the 'Metropolitan
220 Atlanta Rapid Transit Authority Act of 1965'; and by or pursuant to Articles 2, 2A,
221 2B, 3, 4, 5, 5A, and 5B of this chapter.
222 (iii) 'Qualifying construction materials' means any materials used in the construction
223 of a capital outlay project for educational purposes that will remain as part of such
224 project after completion of construction or that become incorporated into such
225 project's real property. Such term shall not include any materials that remain in the
226 possession of a contractor after the completion of construction.
227 (E) This paragraph shall stand repealed on December 31, 2033;"
228 PART III
229 SECTION 3-1.
230 Said title is further amended in Code Section 48-8-6, relating to prohibition of political
231 subdivisions from imposing various taxes, ceiling on local sales and use taxes, and taxation
232 of mobile telecommunications, by revising subsection (a) as follows:
233 "(a)(1) Except as provided in this subsection, on and after July 1, 2024, there shall not
234 be imposed in any jurisdiction in this state or on any transaction in this state local sales
235 taxes, local use taxes, or local sales and use taxes in excess of 2 percent. For purposes
236 of this such 2 percent limitation, the taxes affected are any sales tax, use tax, or sales and
237 use tax which is levied in an area consisting of less than the entire state, however
238 authorized, including such taxes authorized by or pursuant to constitutional amendment,
239 and regardless of whether another provision of law purports to the contrary, except for
240 the following:
241 (A) A 1 percent sales and use tax for educational purposes exempted from such
242 limitation under Article VIII, Section VI, Paragraph IV of the Constitution;
- 10 -

25 LC 50 1237S
243 (B) Up to 1 percent in aggregate of any of the transportation related sales and use taxes
244 authorized under Articles 5, 5A, and 5B of this chapter and Article 2 of Chapter 9 of
245 Title 32, and in a county in which a tax is levied and collected pursuant to Part 2 of
246 Article 2A of this chapter, any tax levied for purposes of a metropolitan area system of
247 public transportation, as authorized by the amendment to the Constitution set out at
248 Georgia Laws, 1964, page 1008, the continuation of such amendment under Article XI,
249 Section I, Paragraph IV(d) of the Constitution, and the laws enacted pursuant to such
250 constitutional amendment; and
251 (C) Up to 1 percent in aggregate of any sales and use taxes authorized under Code
252 Section 48-8-96, Code Section 48-8-97, Article 2B of this chapter, Part 3 of Article 3
253 of this chapter, and Article 4 of this chapter.
254 (2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any tax that does not comply
255 with the limitations provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection as of July 1, 2025, but
256 was initiated in compliance with the law in effect prior to January 1, 2025, shall be
257 allowed to continue as authorized under laws that existed prior to July 1, 2025; provided,
258 however, that, upon the expiration or termination of any such tax, such tax shall not be
259 renewed and the jurisdiction that levied such tax shall be fully subject to the limitations
260 imposed by this subsection.
261 (3) This subsection shall not limit the imposition of any local excise tax, which is
262 separately authorized under Chapter 13 of this title.
263 (4) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, if If the imposition of any
264 otherwise authorized local sales tax, local use tax, or local sales and use tax would result
265 in a tax rate in excess of that authorized by this subsection, then such otherwise
266 authorized tax shall not be imposed."
- 11 -

25 LC 50 1237S
267 SECTION 3-2.
268 Said title is further amended by revising Code Section 48-8-109.31, relating to imposition
269 of special sales and use tax within special district and limited time and purpose, as follows:
270 "48-8-109.31.
271 (a) Subject to the requirement of approval by local referendum and the other requirements
272 of this article, to impose there may be imposed within any given special district a special
273 sales and use tax for a limited period of time for the limited purpose of property tax relief.
274 (b) Except as to rate, a tax imposed under this part shall correspond to the tax imposed by
275 Article 1 of this chapter. No item or transaction which is not subject to taxation under
276 Article 1 of this chapter shall be subject to a tax imposed under this article, except that a
277 tax imposed under this article shall apply to sales of motor fuels as prepaid local tax as
278 defined in Code Section 48-8-2 and shall be applicable to the sale of food and food
279 ingredients and alcoholic beverages as provided for in Code Section 48-8-3.
280 (c) The special sales and use tax provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section may
281 be imposed by a special district in 0.05 percent increments, but in no event shall such tax
282 exceed 1 percent in total. The levy of such tax upon sales of motor fuels as defined in
283 Code Section 48-9-2 shall only be imposed on the retail sales price of the motor fuel which
284 is not more than $3.00 per gallon.
285 (d)(1) As a condition conditions precedent to the issuance of the call for the referendum:
286 (1)(A) The governing authority of the county whose geographical boundary is
287 conterminous with that of the special district and the governing authority or authorities
288 of all municipalities in such county that levy an ad valorem tax on property, other than
289 those municipalities that are excluded from the special district pursuant to paragraph (3)
290 subsection (f) of this subsection Code section, shall have in effect a base year value
291 homestead exemption or adjusted base year value homestead exemption, except that such
292 condition precedent shall not apply with respect to any municipality that levies an ad
- 12 -

25 LC 50 1237S
293 valorem tax on property and that represents no more than 5 percent of the special district's
294 residents of municipalities that levy an ad valorem tax on property; and
295 (B)(2) The governing authority of the county whose geographical boundary is
296 conterminous with that of the special district and the governing authority or authorities,
297 if any, that represent at least 50 percent of the special district's residents of municipalities
298 that levy an ad valorem tax on property, other than those municipalities that are excluded
299 from the special district pursuant to paragraph (3) of this subsection (f) of this Code
300 section, shall enter into an intergovernmental agreement calling for the tax authorized
301 under this article and specifying the proposed rate of the tax, the proposed maximum
302 period of time that the tax is to be levied, and the proposed distribution of the tax.
303 (e)(1) As used in this subsection, the term 'absent municipality' means any municipality
304 that levies an ad valorem tax on property, other than those municipalities that are
305 excluded from the special district pursuant to subsection (f) of this Code section, and that
306 did not enter into the intergovernmental agreement provided for in paragraph (2) of
307 subsection (d) of this Code section.
308 (2) If the combined total of the populations of all such absent municipalities is less than
309 one-half of the aggregate population of all municipalities located within the special
310 district that levy an ad valorem tax on property, the political subdivisions governing
311 authorities entering into the such intergovernmental agreement shall, on in behalf of such
312 absent municipalities, specify a percentage of that portion of the remaining proceeds
313 which each municipality that levies an ad valorem tax on property shall receive, which
314 percentage shall not be less than that proportion which each such absent municipality's
315 population bears to the total population of all municipalities that levy ad valorem taxes
316 on property within the special district multiplied by that portion of the remaining
317 proceeds which are received by all such municipalities within the special district. No
318 portion of the tax shall be apportioned to counties and or municipalities that do not levy
- 13 -

25 LC 50 1237S
319 an ad valorem tax on property or do not have a base year value homestead exemption or
320 adjusted base year value homestead exemption in effect.
321 (3)(f) Subject to the limitation provided for in Code Section 48-8-6, any special district
322 which wholly or partially contains a jurisdiction levying the tax provided for under
323 Article 4 of this chapter is authorized to levy the tax authorized under this article. Such tax
324 authorized under this article may only be levied in the areas of the special district outside
325 of the jurisdiction levying the tax provided for under Article 4 of this chapter. Any
326 jurisdiction levying the tax provided for under Article 4 of this chapter shall not be
327 considered within the procedure necessary to levy the tax under this article and shall not
328 be entitled to any portion of said tax."
329 SECTION 3-3.
330 Said title is further amended in Code Section 48-8-109.32, relating to maximum period of
331 time of the tax, submission to voters to determine imposition of tax, ballot language, and
332 expenses of election, by adding a new subsection to read as follows:
333 "(e) If no intergovernmental agreement is required pursuant to this article, the governing
334 authority of the county or consolidated government whose geographical boundary is
335 conterminous with that of the special district shall adopt a resolution which meets the
336 requirements provided for in this Code section for intergovernmental agreements."
337 SECTION 3-4.
338 Said title is further amended in Code Section 48-8-109.33, relating to timing for imposition
339 of tax following approval and termination of tax, by revising paragraph (2) of subsection (a)
340 and subsection (c) as follows:
341 "(2) With respect to services that are regularly billed on a monthly basis, however, the
342 resolution or ordinance imposing the tax shall become effective and the tax shall apply
343 to the first regular billing period coinciding with or following the effective date specified
- 14 -

25 LC 50 1237S
344 in paragraph (1) of this subsection. A certified copy of the ordinance intergovernmental
345 agreement or resolution imposing required to impose the tax authorized by this article
346 shall be forwarded to the commissioner to ensure it is received within five business days
347 after certification of the election results."
348 "(c) For any special district in which a tax authorized by this article is in effect may, while
349 such tax is in effect, the General Assembly may pass a local Act calling for a reimposition
350 of a tax as authorized by this article upon the termination of the tax then in effect, and a
351 referendum may be held for this purpose while the tax is in effect. Proceedings for such
352 reimposition shall be in the same manner as proceedings for the initial imposition of the
353 tax as provided for in Code Section Sections 48-8-109.31 and 48-8-109.32. Such newly
354 authorized tax shall not be imposed until the expiration of the tax then in effect."
355 PART IV
356 SECTION 4-1.
357 (a) This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming
358 law without such approval and, except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, shall be
359 applicable on and after such date.
360 (b) Part I of this Act shall be applicable to taxable years beginning on or after
361 January 1, 2025.
362 SECTION 4-2.
363 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 15 -